Illinois, session 104th, SB428.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Access to Research Articles Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 61/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Open 8Access to Research Articles Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-295, eff. 8-9-13.)